Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Chapter 22

Acknowledgment of Instruments

66-22-101. Authentication.

Unless otherwise provided by law, to authenticate an instrument or document for registration or recording in the office of the county register, the maker or the natural person acting on behalf of the maker shall execute the instrument or document by that person's original signature, and the signature shall be either acknowledged according to law or proved by at least two (2) subscribing witnesses. The county register may refuse to record any instrument or document not authenticated in accordance with this section.

For purposes of this section, “person's original signature” includes an electronic signature as defined in § 8-16-302.

For purposes of this title and subject to subsection (d), a person may personally appear before the officer taking the acknowledgment by:

Appearing physically before the officer; or

Appearing by means of an interactive two-way audio and video communication that meets the online notarization requirements under rules promulgated by the secretary of state pursuant to the Online Notary Public Act, compiled in title 8, chapter 16, part 3, to provide for the orderly administration of this chapter.

The acknowledging officer must designate in the acknowledgment form whether the principal personally appeared before the officer by means of an interactive two-way audio and video communication pursuant to subdivision (c)(2). If the person appears by means of an interactive two-way audio and video communication, the appearance and the certificate shall be deemed compliant with this chapter if the acknowledging officer amends the acknowledgment forms set forth in §§ 66-22-107, 66-22-108, and 66-22-114, to read “personally appeared before me by audio-video communication” or “personally appeared by audio-video communication” or “before me appear by audio-video communication” rather than “personally appeared before me” or “personally appeared” or “before me appear”.

Code 1858, § 2038 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 16, § 2; 1807, ch. 85, § 3; 1831, ch. 90, § 1; 1839-1840, ch. 26, § 1); Shan., § 3712; Code 1932, § 7630; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2201; Acts 1986, ch. 717, § 1; 2004, ch. 576, § 1; 2018, ch. 931, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Earlier statutes as to authentication included Acts 1715, ch. 28, § 5; 1766, ch. 4, § 2; 1770, ch. 9; 1777 (Apr.), ch. 10; 1782, ch. 5, § 2; 1784 (Apr.), ch. 21, § 2; 1788, ch. 24, § 2; 1794, ch. 22, § 2.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, added (b)-(d); and, substituted “by that person's original signature, and the signature” for “by that person's original signature and such signature” in present (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 931, § 5. July 1, 2019; provided that for administrative and rulemaking purposes, the act took effect May 15, 2018.

Cross-References. Authentication by witnesses, title 66, ch. 23.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, §§ 3, 4, 15; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 15; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, § 8.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, IV. Transfers of Land (Beverly A. Rowlett), 48 Tenn. L. Rev. 53, 72 (1980).

66-22-102. Persons authorized to take acknowledgments within state.

If the person executing the instrument resides or is within the state, the acknowledgment shall be made before the county clerk, or legally appointed deputy county clerk, or clerk and master of chancery court of some county in the state or before a notary public of some county in this state.

Code 1858, § 2039 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 85, § 3; 1835-1836, ch. 53, §§ 5, 6; 1837-1838, ch. 150, § 1); Acts 1870, ch. 71, § 1; 1870-1871, ch. 11, § 1; Shan., § 3713; Acts 1919, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; Shan. Supp., §§ 3714a1-3714a3; mod. Code 1932, § 7631; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2202.

Cross-References. Acknowledgment by servicemen's wives, §§58-1-605 —58-1-607.

Acknowledgments by members of armed forces, §§58-1-605 —58-1-607.

Official misconduct, §39-16-402.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, § 11.

66-22-103. Acknowledgment in other states or territories.

If the person executing the instrument resides or is beyond or without the limits of the state, but within the union or its territories or districts, the acknowledgment may be made:

Before any court of record, or before the clerk of any court of record; or, before a commissioner for Tennessee, appointed by the governor; or before a notary public authorized there to take proof or acknowledgments. If the acknowledgment is made before a court of record, a copy of the entry of the acknowledgment on the record shall be certified by the clerk, under the clerk's seal of office; and the judge, chief justice, or presiding magistrate of the court shall certify as to the official character of the clerk; or

Before any other officer of such state, territory or district, authorized by the laws there to take the proof and acknowledgment of deed. There shall in cases under this subdivision (2) be subjoined or attached to the certificate of proof or acknowledgment, signed by such other officer, a certificate of the secretary of state of the state or territory in which such officer resides, under the seal of such state, territory, or a certificate of the clerk of a court of record of such state, territory, or district, in the county in which the officer resides or in which the officer took such proof or acknowledgment under the seal of such court, stating that such officer was, at the time of taking such proof or acknowledgment duly authorized to take acknowledgments and proof of deeds of lands in the state, territory, or district, and that the secretary of state or clerk of court is well acquainted with the handwriting of such officer, and that the officer verily believes that the signature affixed to such certificate of proof or acknowledgment is genuine.

Code 1858, § 2040 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 85, § 3); 1831, ch. 90, § 9; 1839-1840, ch. 26, §§ 2, 3, 5; 1855-1856, ch. 115, § 1; Shan., § 3715; Acts 1919, ch. 48, §§ 3, 4; Shan. Supp., §§ 3747a4, 3747a5; mod. Code 1932, § 7632; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2203.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, §§ 1, 9, 11-13; 11 Tenn. Juris., Evidence, § 74.

66-22-104. Acknowledgment in foreign countries.

If the person executing the instrument resides or is beyond the limits of the union and its territories, the acknowledgment may be made:

Before a commissioner for Tennessee appointed in the country where the acknowledgment is made, having an official seal;

Before a notary public of such country, having an official seal; and

Before a consul, charge d'affaires, envoy, minister, or ambassador of the United States in the country to which such person is accredited and where the acknowledgment is made.

When the seal affixed contains the name or official style of such officer, any error, in stating or failing to state otherwise such name or official style of the officer, shall not render the certificate defective.

Code 1858, § 2041 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 26, §§ 2-4); Shan., § 3716; Acts 1921, ch. 82, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3747a10; mod. Code 1932, § 7633; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2204.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, §§ 9, 12.

66-22-105. Authentication of instruments by or to county clerk.

The probate or acknowledgment of any deed or other instrument, made by or to a clerk of any county, may be taken and made before the judge having probate jurisdiction in the clerk's county, the clerk and master or the notary public, and the authentication entered on record in the office of the county clerk as other instruments; provided, that the clerk collect and account for the state tax on all such instruments as though the acknowledgment had been taken before the clerk.

Code 1858, § 2069; Acts 1868-1869, ch. 32, § 1; Shan., § 3746; mod. Code 1932, § 7661; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2205.

Cross-References. Fees of county clerk, §8-21-701.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, § 1.

66-22-106. Postponement pending identification.

If the clerk or deputy clerk does not know, is not personally acquainted with, or does not have satisfactory evidence of a person wishing to make acknowledgment of the execution of an instrument, the clerk or deputy clerk shall file it, and note, on the record of the probate of deeds, the date of the presentation of the instrument, and the reason of the postponement of the acknowledgment; and then, within twenty (20) days, the party may produce witnesses before the clerk or deputy clerk, to prove the identity of the person so offering to acknowledge the same; and the deed, when acknowledged after such proof, shall take effect from the filing with the clerk.

For purposes of this chapter, “know” or “personally acquainted with” means having an acquaintance, derived from association with the individual in relation to other people and based upon a chain of circumstances surrounding the individual, which establishes the individual's identity with at least reasonable certainty.

For the purposes of this chapter, “satisfactory evidence” means the absence of any information, evidence, or other circumstances which would lead a reasonable person to believe that the person making the acknowledgment is not the individual such person claims to be and any one (1) of the following:

The oath or affirmation of a credible witness personally known to the officer that the person making the acknowledgment is personally known to the witness;

Reasonable reliance on the presentation to the officer of any one of the following, if the document is current or has been issued within five (5) years:

An identification card or driver's license issued by the department of safety; or

A passport issued by the United States department of state; or

Reasonable reliance on the presentation of any one (1) of the following, if the document is current or has been issued within five (5) years and contains a photograph and description of the person named on it, is signed by the person, bears a serial or other identifying number, and, in the event that the document is a passport, has been stamped by the United States immigration and naturalization service:

A passport issued by a foreign government;

A driver's license issued by a state other than Tennessee;

An identification card issued by a state other than Tennessee; or

An identification card issued by any branch of the armed forces of the United States.

An officer who has taken an acknowledgment pursuant to this section shall be presumed to have operated in accordance with this chapter.

Any party who files an action for damages based on the failure of the officer to establish the proper identity of the person making the acknowledgment shall have the burden of proof in establishing the negligence or misconduct of the officer.

Code 1858, § 2047 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 92, §§ 13, 14); Shan., § 3722; Code 1932, § 7637; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2206; Acts 1983, ch. 158, § 1.

Cross-References. Consumer protection when utilizing notary services, §8-16-204.

Fee for filing presentation for acknowledgment, §66-22-112.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

66-22-107. Form of certificate of acknowledgment.

If the acknowledgment is made before a county clerk or deputy, or clerk and master, or notary public, or before any of the officers out of the state who are commissioned or accredited to act at the place where the acknowledgment is taken, and having an official seal, viz: those named in §§ 66-22-103 and 66-22-104, and, also, any consular officer of the United States having an official seal, such officer shall write upon or annex to the instrument the following certificate, in which the officer shall set forth such officer's official capacity:

State of Tennessee )County of )

Personally appeared before me, (name of clerk or deputy), clerk (or deputy clerk) of this county, (bargainor's name), the within named bargainor, with whom I am personally acquainted (or proved to me on the basis of satisfactory evidence), and who acknowledged that such person executed the within instrument for the purposes therein contained.

Witness my hand, at office, this day of , 20 .

Or, in the alternative, the following certificate, in case of natural persons acting in their own right:

State of Tennessee )County of )

On this day of , 20 , before me personally appeared , to me known to be the person (or persons) described in and who executed the foregoing instrument, and acknowledged that such person (or persons) executed the same as such person's (or persons') free act and deed.

Or, in case of natural persons acting by attorney:

State of Tennessee )County of )

On this day of , 20 , before me personally appeared , to me known (or proved to me on the basis of satisfactory evidence) to be the person who executed the foregoing instrument in behalf of acknowledged that such person executed the same as the free act and deed of .

Code 1858, § 2042 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 90, § 3); Shan., § 3717; Acts 1919, ch. 48, § 1; Shan. Supp. § 3747a2; mod. Code 1932, § 7634; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2207; Acts 1983, ch. 158, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1986, ch. 717, § 3 purported to repeal §§66-22-107 and66-22-108 effective July 1, 1987; however, Acts 1986, ch. 717, § 3 has itself been repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 125, § 3.

Cross-References. Certificate of acknowledgment form, §66-22-114.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 7-402, 7-403, 7-405.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, §§ 1, 8, 15, 20; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 15.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-22-108. Acknowledgment for record of corporate or partnership instrument.

The authentication or acknowledgment for record of a deed or other instrument in writing executed by a corporation, whether it has a seal or not, shall be good and sufficient, when made in substantially the following form:

State of Tennessee )County of )

Before me, of the state and county mentioned, personally appeared , with whom I am personally acquainted (or proved to me on the basis of satisfactory evidence), and who, upon oath, acknowledged such person to be president (or other officer authorized to execute the instrument) of , the within named bargainor, a corporation, and that such president or officer as such , executed the foregoing instrument for the purpose therein contained, by personally signing the name of the corporation as .

Witness my hand and seal, at office in , this day of .

Or, alternatively as follows:

State of Tennessee )County of )

On this day of , 20 , before me appear A. B. , to me personally known (or proved to me on the basis of satisfactory evidence), who, being by me duly sworn (or affirmed) did say that such person is the president (or other officer or agent of the corporation or association) of (describing the corporation or association), and that the seal affixed to the instrument is the corporate seal of the corporation (or association), and that the instrument was signed and sealed in behalf of the corporation (or association), by authority of its Board of Directors (or Trustees) and A. B. acknowledged the instrument to be the free act and deed of the corporation (or association).

(In case the corporation or association has no corporate seal, omit the words “the seal affixed to the instrument is the corporate seal of the corporation or association and that,” and add at the end of the affidavit clause, the words “and that the corporation (or association) has no corporate seal”). (In all cases add signature and title of officer taking the acknowledgment.)

The authentication or acknowledgment for record of a deed or other instrument in writing executed by a partnership shall be good and sufficient when made in substantially the following form:

State of Tennessee )County of )

Before me, , of the state and county aforementioned, personally appeared , with whom I am personally acquainted (or proved to me on the basis of satisfactory evidence), and who, upon oath, acknowledged such person to be a partner of , the within named bargainor, a partnership, and that such person, as such partner, executed the foregoing instrument for the purpose therein contained, by signing the name of the partnership by such person as partner.

Witness my hand and seal, this day of , .

The signing of a certificate of acknowledgment for a partnership will not change any requirement of the partnership agreement itself.

Acts 1899, ch. 187, § 1; Shan., § 3747a1; Acts 1919, ch. 48, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3747a2; Code 1932, § 7663; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2208; Acts 1982, ch. 800, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 158, §§ 4-8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1986, ch. 717, § 3 purported to repeal §§66-22-107 and66-22-108 effective July 1, 1987; however, Acts 1986, ch. 717, § 3 has itself been repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 125, § 3.

Cross-References. Certificate of acknowledgment form, §66-22-114.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 7-406 — 7-409.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, § 8, 15, 20; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 15.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

66-22-109. Acknowledgment of married person.

The acknowledgment of a married person, when required by law, may be taken in the same form as if such person were sole and without any examination separate and apart from that person's spouse.

Acts 1919, ch. 48, § 2; Shan., Supp., § 3747a3; Code 1932, § 7635; Acts 1975, ch. 283, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2209.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 82.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, § 7.

66-22-110. Acknowledgments under seal.

All acknowledgments shall be under the seal of office of the officer taking same.

Code 1858, § 2043 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 26, § 2); Shan., § 3718; mod. Code 1932, § 7636; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2210.

66-22-111. Entry of probate or acknowledgment.

The clerk shall enter, in a well-bound book, the probate or acknowledgment of every deed or other instrument of writing proved or acknowledged before the clerk, which entry shall state:

The date of the presentation of the paper where it is filed with the clerk, but is not proven or acknowledged because the witnesses fail or refuse to attend, or the clerk is not acquainted with the maker of the instrument;

The date of the probate or acknowledgment;

The names of the maker of the instrument and the person to whom it is made;

The number of acres of land or town lots, or parts or portions of tracts of land or town lots, or other property mentioned in the paper; and

A county or town in which the property is situated.

Code 1858, § 2087 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 92, § 15); Shan., § 3767; Code 1932, § 7678; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2211.

66-22-112. Fees of clerk.

For the clerk's services in this behalf, the clerk shall have the following fees:

For issuing a subpoena for each witness required to be summoned to prove the execution of a writing $ .25

For filing and entering the date of the presentation of a deed or other instrument, when its authentication is not completed at the time of presentation, in addition to the fees allowed by law for taking probates and acknowledgments of deeds and other instruments, and certifying the same $ .10

Code 1858, § 2088 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 92, § 17); impl. am. Acts 1899, ch. 323, § 1; Shan., § 3768; Code 1932, § 7679; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2212.

Cross-References. Clerk's fees in general, §8-21-701.

66-22-113. Liability of officer for failure to carry out duties.

If the clerk or other officer who takes the probate or acknowledgment of a deed or other instrument fails or refuses to comply with and discharge the duties required of the clerk or officer, the clerk or officer shall forfeit and pay the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for the use of the county in which the clerk or officer resides, which may be recovered by action of debt, in the name of the trustee of the county, in the circuit or chancery court; and the clerk or officer shall, moreover, be liable to the party injured for all damages the clerk or officer may sustain by such failure or refusal, together with costs, to be recovered by action on the case in the circuit or chancery court.

Code 1858, § 2089 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 92, § 18); Shan., § 3769; mod. Code 1932, § 7680; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2213.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Acknowledgments, § 2.

66-22-114. Certificate of acknowledgment form.

If the acknowledgment is made before any of the officers who are authorized to take such acknowledgment under this chapter or any consular officer of the United States having an official seal, such officer shall write upon or annex to the instrument a certificate of acknowledgment. The following form shall constitute a valid certificate of acknowledgment:

State of Tennessee )

County of )

Personally appeared before me, (name of officer), (official capacity of officer), (name of the natural person executing the instrument), with whom I am personally acquainted, and who acknowledged that such person executed the within instrument for the purposes therein contained (the following to be included only where the natural person is executing as agent), and who further acknowledged that such person is the (identification of the agency position of the natural person executing the instrument, such as “attorney-in-fact” or “president” or “general partner”) of the maker or a constituent of the maker and is authorized by the maker or by its constituent, the constituent being authorized by the maker, to execute this instrument on behalf of the maker.

Witness my hand, at office, this day of , 20 .

Any certificate clearly evidencing intent to authenticate, acknowledge or verify a document shall constitute a valid certificate of acknowledgment for purposes of this chapter and for any other purpose for which such certificate may be used under the law. It is the legislative intent that no specific form or wording be required in such certificate and that the ownership of property, or the determination of any other right or obligation, shall not be affected by the inclusion or omission of any specific words.

Acts 1986, ch. 717, § 2; 1987, ch. 125, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Acknowledgment form for corporate or partnership instrument, §66-22-108.

Form of certificate of acknowledgment, §66-22-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 7-401 — 7-409.

Law Reviews.

1987 Legislation Affecting Tennessee Real Estate Practice (William R. Bruce), 23 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 21 (1987).

66-22-115. Recognition of certificate of acknowledgment.

The form of a certificate of acknowledgment used by a person whose authority is recognized under §§ 66-22-103 and 66-22-104, shall be accepted in this state if the:

Certificate is in a form prescribed by the laws or regulations of this state; or

Certificate is in a form prescribed by the laws or regulations applicable in the other state, or territory, or foreign country in which the acknowledgment is taken.

A notarial act performed prior to March 29, 1995, is not affected by this section. This section provides an additional method of proving notarial acts. Nothing in this section diminishes or invalidates the recognition accorded to notarial acts by other laws or regulations of this state.

Acts 1995, ch. 52, § 1.

Cross-References. Notaries public, title 8, ch. 16.